Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXX Contracts
Sales Representatives’ Contracts

371.370.
Definitions for KRS 371.375 to 371.385.

As used in KRS

371.375

to

371.385

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissions” means compensation accruing to a sales representative for payment by a principal, the rate of which is expressed as a percentage of the amount of orders or sales or as a specified amount per order or per sale.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, association, estate, or trust.

“Principal” means a person who does not have a permanent or fixed place of business in this state and who:

Manufactures, produces, imports, or distributes a tangible product for wholesale;

Contracts with a sales representative to solicit orders for the product; and

Compensates the sales representative, in whole or in part, by commission.

“Sales representative” means a person who:

Contracts with a principal to solicit wholesale orders;

Is compensated, in whole or in part, by commission;

Does not place orders or purchase for his own account or for resale; and

Does not sell or take orders for the sale of products to the ultimate consumer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 167, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

371.375.
Termination of contract — Civil action — Liability of principal or sales representative.

When a contract between a sales representative and a principal is terminated for any reason, the principal shall pay the sales representative all commissions accrued under the contract to the sales representative within thirty (30) days after the effective date of such termination.

A principal who fails to comply with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be liable to the sales representative in a civil action for:

All amounts due the sales representative, plus exemplary damages in an amount not to exceed two (2) times the amount of commissions due the sales representative; and

Attorney’s fees actually and reasonably incurred by the sales representative in the action and court costs.

Where the court determines that an action brought by a sales representative against a principal under KRS

371.370

to

371.385

is frivolous, the sales representative shall be liable to the principal for attorney’s fees actually and reasonably incurred by the principal in defending the action and court costs.

Nothing in KRS

371.370

to

371.385

shall invalidate or restrict any additional right or remedy available to a sales representative or preclude a sales representative from seeking to recover in an action on any other claim against a principal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 167, § 2, effective July 15, 1988.

371.380.
Personal jurisdiction over nonresident principal.

A principal who is not a resident of this state that contracts with a sales representative to solicit orders in this state is declared to be doing business in this state for purposes of the exercise of personal jurisdiction over nonresidents under KRS Chapter 454.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 167, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

371.385.
Waiver provisions to be void.

A provision in any contract between a sales representative and a principal purporting to waive any provision of KRS

371.370

to

371.385

, whether by expressed waiver or by a contract subject to the laws of another state, shall be void.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 167, § 4, effective July 15, 1988.